Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1805
Bonds, defined.

Bonds means bonds, notes, or other obligations of the authority issued under the Nebraska Elementary and Secondary School Finance Authority Act, including refunding bonds, notwithstanding that the same may be secured by the full faith and credit of an elementary or secondary school or any other lawfully pledged security of an elementary or secondary school.

Laws 1997, LB 809, § 5.